Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1486.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that the decisions made by the state board for community and technical colleges greatly impact the lives and education experiences of students and that student participation in the decision-making process can provide meaningful insight into the impact of these decisions from the student perspective, which is unique compared to the perspective of traditional board members.The legislature finds that students have served on higher education-related governing boards in Washington state and other states for decades. Specifically, students serve on the governing boards of systems of community and technical colleges in over 10 other states. Students also serve as voting members on both the Washington student achievement council and the workforce education investment accountability and oversight board. These opportunities have provided students the opportunity to contribute greatly to deliberations where they have been able to share ideas and concerns on decisions that directly impact students.The legislature further finds that student perspectives offer the opportunity to bring the state board for community and technical colleges closer to the student community that it serves. Being on campus and in class every day, students are exposed directly to many topics of interest to the board, which is important for comprehensive and in-depth discussion. Moreover, student populations at community and technical colleges are the most diverse of any institution of higher education in the state, and thus the student member would be exposed to a more diverse group than any other member of the board representing any one group of the community.Additionally, the legislature acknowledges that student positions on governing boards are also a valuable tool for developing leadership through experiential learning. Student members learn processes of institutional governance, analyze policy proposals, and participate in board discussions and decision making.Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to enhance community college governance by the state board of community and technical colleges through fostering a stronger relationship with students in policy development and decision making at the state level.Sec. 2. RCW 28B.50.050 and 1991 c 238 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is hereby created the "state board for community and technical colleges", to consist of ((nine))10 members who represent the geographic diversity of the state, and who shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate. At least two members shall reside east of the Cascade mountains. In making these appointments, the governor shall attempt to provide geographic balance and give consideration to representing labor, business, women, and racial and ethnic minorities, among the membership of the board. At least one member of the board shall be from business and at least one member of the board shall be from labor. ((The current members of the state board for community college education on September 1, 1991, shall serve on the state board for community and technical colleges until their terms expire. Successors to these members shall be appointed according to the terms of this section. A ninth member shall be appointed by September 1, 1991, for a complete term))One member of the board shall be a student enrolled at a community or technical college.(2) The ((successors of the)) members ((initially appointed)), except for the student member, shall be appointed for terms of four years except that a person appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of any term shall be appointed only for the remainder of such term. The student member shall serve for a term of one year. The student member must be at least 18 years of age at the time of appointment. Each member shall serve until the appointment and qualification of his or her successor. All members shall be citizens and bona fide residents of the state.(3) Members of the college board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall receive reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 for each day actually spent in attending to the duties as a member of the college board.(4) The members of the college board may be removed by the governor for inefficiency, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office, in the manner provided by RCW 28B.10.500.(5) A student appointed under this section shall excuse themself from participating or voting on matters relating to hiring, discipline, personnel, or issues pertaining to pending litigation.(6) The college board may adopt rules to implement this section.Sec. 3. RCW 28B.50.070 and 1987 c 505 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:The governor shall make the appointments to the college board.The college board shall organize, adopt a seal, and adopt bylaws for its administration, not inconsistent herewith, as it may deem expedient and may from time to time amend such bylaws. Annually the board shall elect a chairperson and vice chairperson; all to serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. The college board shall at its initial meeting fix a date and place for its regular meeting. ((Five))Six members shall constitute a quorum, and no meeting shall be held with less than a quorum present, and no action shall be taken by less than a majority of the college board.Special meetings may be called as provided by its rules and regulations. Regular meetings shall be held at the college board's established offices in Olympia, but whenever the convenience of the public or of the parties may be promoted, or delay or expenses may be prevented, it may hold its meetings, hearings or proceedings at any other place designated by it. Subject to RCW 40.07.040, the college board shall transmit a report in writing to the governor biennially which report shall contain such information as may be requested by the governor. The fiscal year of the college board shall conform to the fiscal year of the state.--- END ---